Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.090

Certificate of licensing—Seal.

The director shall issue a certificate of licensing to any applicant who has satisfactorily met all of the requirements of this chapter for licensing as a geologist or an approved specialty geologist. The certificate shall show the full name of the license holder, shall have a certificate number, and shall be signed by the director and an officer of the board. The issuance by the director of a certificate of licensing to an individual shall be prima facie evidence that the person is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a licensed geologist or specialty geologist while the certificate remains unrevoked or unexpired.

Each license holder shall obtain a seal of the design authorized by the director, bearing the licensee's name, certificate number, and the legend "licensed geologist" together with any specialty in which the individual may be authorized. Geological reports, plans, and other technical documents prepared by or under the responsible charge of the license holder shall be signed, dated, and stamped with the seal or facsimile thereof. Each signature and stamping constitutes a certification by the license holder that the document was prepared by or under his or her responsible charge and that to his or her knowledge and belief the document was prepared in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2000 c 253 s 10.]